California statutes. Civil Code
(b) Only one delinquency charge may be collected on any installment regardless of the period during which it remains in default. No delinquency charge shall be imposed for any default of payment on any payment due prior to the mailing or delivery to the buyer of the written disclosure concerning the delinquency charge provided by the seller or holder of a retail installment account pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1810.3. Payments timely received by the seller under a written extension or deferral agreement shall not be subject to any delinquency charge. The agreement may also provide for payment of any actual and reasonable costs of collection occasioned by removal of the goods from the state without written permission of the holder, or by the failure of the buyer to notify the holder of any change of residence, or by the failure of the buyer to communicate with the
 holder for a period of 45 days after any default in making payments due under the agreement.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1810.3, the seller or holder of a retail installment account shall provide a minimum of 20 days between the monthly billing date and the date upon which the minimum payment is due, exclusive of the applicable grace period provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Retail Installment Account Credit Card Periodic Rate Disclosures [1810.20. - 1810.21.]

1810.20.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Areias Retail Installment Account Full Disclosure Act of 1986.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 375, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.21.

(a) Any application form or preapproved written solicitation for a credit card issued in connection with a retail installment account that is mailed on or after October 1, 1987, to a retail buyer residing in this state by or on behalf of a retail seller, whether or not the retail seller is located in this state, other than an application form or solicitation included in a magazine, newspaper, or other publication distributed by someone other than the retail seller, shall contain or be accompanied by either of the following
 disclosures:

(1) A disclosure of each of the following, if applicable:

(A) Any periodic rate or rates that will be used to determine the finance charge imposed on the balance due under the terms of a retail installment account, expressed as an annual percentage rate or rates.

(B) Any membership or participation fee that will be imposed for availability of a retail installment account in connection with which a credit card is issued expressed as an annualized amount.

(C) If the retail seller provides a period during which the retail buyer may repay the full balance reflected on a billing statement that is attributable to purchases of goods or services from the retail seller without the imposition of additional finance charges, the retail seller shall
 either disclose the minimum number of days of that period, calculated from the closing date of the prior billing cycle to the date designated in the billing statement sent to the retail buyer as the date by which that payment must be received to avoid additional finance charges, or describe the manner in which the period is calculated. For purposes of this section, the period shall be referred to as the “free period” or “free-ride period.” If the retail seller does not provide this period for purchases, the disclosure shall so indicate.

(2) A disclosure that satisfies the initial disclosure statement requirements of Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.6).

(b) In the event that an unsolicited application form is mailed or otherwise delivered to retail buyers in more than one state, the requirements of subdivision (a) shall be satisfied if on the application form or the soliciting material
 there is a notice that credit terms may vary from state to state and that provides either the disclosures required by subdivision (a) or an address or phone number for the customer to use to obtain the disclosure. The notice shall be in boldface type no smaller than the largest type used in the narrative portion, excluding headlines, of the material soliciting the application. Any person responding to the notice shall be given the disclosures required by subdivision (a).

(c) A retail seller need not present the disclosures required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in chart form or use any specific terminology, except as expressly provided in this section. The following chart shall not be construed in any way as a standard by which to determine whether a retail seller who elects not to use the chart has provided the required disclosures in a manner which satisfies paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). However, disclosures shall be conclusively
 presumed to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if a chart with captions substantially as follows is completed with the applicable terms offered by the retail seller, or if the retail seller presents the applicable terms in tabular, list, or narrative format using terminology substantially similar to the captions included in the following chart:THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IS PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE
AREIAS RETAIL INSTALLMENT ACCOUNT FULL DISCLOSURE ACT 
OF 1986:
 CREDIT CARD TERMS VARY AMONG RETAIL SELLERS—SELECTED 
TERMS FOR PURCHASES UNDER THIS RETAIL INSTALLMENT 
ACCOUNT ARE SET OUT BELOWPERIODICRATES(as APRs)

ANNUALFEES

FREE–RIDEPERIOD(d) For purposes of this section, “Regulation Z” has the meaning attributed to it under Section 1802.18, and all of the terms used in this section have the same meaning as attributed to them in federal Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.1 et seq.).

(e) Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to prohibit a retail seller from disclosing additional terms, conditions, or information, whether or not relating to the disclosures required under this section, in conjunction with the disclosures required by this section. Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of
 Section 1748.11, a retail seller that complies with the requirements of Section 1748.11 shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this section.

(f) If a retail seller is required under federal law to make any disclosure of the terms applicable to a retail installment account in connection with application forms or solicitations, the retail seller shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) with respect to those application forms or solicitations if the retail seller complies with the federal disclosure requirement.

(g) If the disclosure required by this section does not otherwise appear on an application form or an accompanying retail installment agreement distributed in this state on or after October 1, 1987, other than by mail, the application form shall include a statement in substantially the following form:

“If you wish to receive disclosure of the terms of this retail installment account, pursuant to the Areias Retail Installment Account Full Disclosure Act of 1986, check here and return to the address on this form.”

A box shall be printed in or next to this statement for placing such a checkmark.

(h) This article does not apply to (1) any application form or preapproved written solicitation for a retail installment account credit card where the credit to be extended will be secured by a lien on real or personal property, or both real and personal property, (2) any application form or written solicitation that invites a person or persons to apply for a retail installment account credit card and which is included as part of a catalog which is sent to one or more persons by a creditor in order to facilitate a credit sale of goods offered in the catalog, (3) any
 advertisement which does not invite, directly or indirectly, an application for a retail installment account credit card, and (4) any application form or written advertisement included in a magazine, newspaper, or other publication distributed in more than one state by someone other than the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Attorney’s Fees and Court Costs [1811.1. - 1811.1.]

1811.1.

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing party in any action on a contract or installment account subject to the provisions of this chapter regardless of whether such action is instituted by the seller, holder or buyer. Where the defendant alleges in his answer that he tendered to the plaintiff the full amount to which he was entitled, and thereupon deposits in court, for the plaintiff, the amount so tendered, and the allegation is found to be true, then the defendant is deemed to be a prevailing party within the meaning of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.1. Repossession and Resale [1812.2. - 1812.5.]

1812.2.

In the event of any default by the buyer in the performance of his obligations under a contract or installment account, the holder, pursuant to any rights granted therein, may proceed to recover judgment for the balance due without retaking the goods, or he may retake the goods and proceed as hereinafter provided. If he retakes the goods, he shall, within 10 days, give notice to the buyer of his intention to sell the goods at public sale or give notice to the buyer of his intention to retain the goods in satisfaction of the balance due. The notice must state the amount of the overdue payments, that the buyer must pay, if he pays within 10 days of the notice, in order
 to redeem the goods. In either case the buyer shall have an absolute right to redeem the goods within 10 days after the notice is given by paying or tendering the amount owing under the contract. If the holder gives notice of election to sell the goods the buyer shall also have the absolute right to redeem the goods at any time before sale by paying or tendering the amounts specified above and also any expense reasonably incurred by the seller or holder in good faith in repairing, reconditioning the goods or preparing them for sale. If the holder gives notice of his intention to retain the goods in satisfaction of the indebtedness he shall be deemed to have done so at the end of the 10-day period if the goods are not redeemed; at the time the notice is given, the holder shall furnish the buyer a written statement of the sum due under the contract and the expenses provided for in this section. For failure to render such a statement the holder shall forfeit to the buyer ten dollars ($10) and also be liable to
 him for all damages suffered because of such failure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1952.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.3.

The notice provided for in Section 1812.2 shall be given to the buyer and any other person liable by causing it to be delivered personally or to be deposited in the United States mail addressed to the buyer or to such other person at his last known address and shall advise the buyer or such other person of his right to redeem as provided for in Section 1812.2. If the holder determines to sell the goods at public sale he shall give notice of the time and place of sale at least 10 days before the date of sale by delivering a copy of the notice personally to the buyer or other person liable or depositing the same in the United States mail addressed to the buyer or such
 other person at his last known address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.4.

The proceeds of a resale shall be applied (1) to the payment of the expenses thereof, (2) to the payment of any expenses of retaking, including reasonable attorney’s fees actually incurred, and of any expenses of keeping, storing, repairing, reconditioning or preparing the goods for sale to which the holder may be entitled, (3) to the satisfaction of the balance due under the contract. Any sum remaining after the satisfaction of such claims shall be paid to the buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.5.

If the proceeds of the sale are not sufficient to cover items (1), (2) and (3) of Section 1812.4, the holder may not recover the deficiency from the buyer or from anyone who has succeeded to the obligations of the buyer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1952.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.2. Penalties [1812.6. - 1812.9.]

1812.6.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.7.

In case of failure by any person to comply with the provisions of this chapter, such person or any person who acquires a contract or installment account with knowledge of such noncompliance is barred from recovery of any finance charge or of any delinquency, collection, extension, deferral or refinance charge imposed in connection with such contract or installment account and the buyer shall have the right to recover from such person an amount equal to any of such charges paid by the buyer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.8.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, any failure to comply with any provision of this chapter may be corrected by the holder in accordance with the provisions of this section, provided that a willful violation may not be corrected, and a correction which will increase the amount owed by the buyer or the amount of any payment shall not be effective unless the buyer concurs in writing to the correction. If a violation is corrected by the holder in accordance with the provisions of this section, neither the seller nor the holder shall be subject to any penalty under this article. The correction shall be made by delivery to the buyer of a corrected copy of the
 contract within 30 days of the execution of the original contract by the buyer. Any amount improperly collected from the buyer shall be credited against the indebtedness evidenced by the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.9.

In any case in which a person willfully violates any provision of this chapter in connection with the imposition, computation or disclosures of or relating to a finance charge on a consolidated total of two or more contracts under the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 1808.1) of this chapter, the buyer may recover from such person an amount equal to three times the total of the finance charges and any delinquency, collection, extension, deferral or refinance charges imposed, contracted for or received on all contracts included in the consolidated total and the seller shall be barred from the recovery of any such charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.3. Actions [1812.10. - 1812.10.]

1812.10.

(a) An action on a contract or installment account under this chapter shall be tried in the superior court in the county where the contract was in fact signed by the buyer, where the buyer resided at the time the contract was entered into, where the buyer resides at the commencement of the action, or where the goods purchased pursuant to the contract have been so affixed to real property as to become a part of that real property.

(b) In the superior court designated as
 the proper court in subdivision (a), the proper court location for trial of an action under this chapter is the location where the court tries that type of action that is nearest or most accessible to where the contract was in fact signed by the buyer, where the buyer resided at the time the contract was entered into, where the buyer resides at the commencement of the action, or where the goods purchased pursuant to the contract have been so affixed to real property as to become a part of that real property. Otherwise, any location of the superior court designated as the proper court in subdivision (a) is the proper court location for the trial of the action. The court may specify by local rule the nearest or most accessible court location where the court tries that type of case.

(c) In any action subject to this section, concurrently with the filing of the complaint, the plaintiff shall file an affidavit stating facts showing that the action
 has been commenced in a superior court and court location described in this section as a proper place for the trial of the action. Those facts may be stated in a verified complaint and shall not be stated on information or belief. When that affidavit is filed with the complaint, a copy thereof shall be served with the summons. If a plaintiff fails to file the affidavit or state facts in a verified complaint required by this section, no further proceedings may occur, but the court shall, upon its own motion or upon motion of any party, dismiss the action without prejudice. The court may, on terms that are just, permit the affidavit to be filed subsequent to the filing of the complaint and a copy of the affidavit shall be served on the defendant. The time to answer or otherwise plead shall date from that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.4. Financing Retail Purchases [1812.20. - 1812.20.]

1812.20.

Notwithstanding Section 1801.6, no person shall require a purchaser of goods or services to obtain financing from any particular source. Any person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalty provided in Section 1812.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Credit Transactions Regarding Women [1812.30. - 1812.35.]

1812.30.

(a) No person, regardless of marital status, shall be denied credit in his or her own name if the earnings and other property over which he or she has management and control are such that a person of the opposite sex managing and controlling the same amount of earnings and other property would receive credit.

(b) No person, regardless of marital status, managing and controlling earnings and other property shall be offered credit on terms less favorable than those offered
to a person of the opposite sex seeking the same type of credit and managing and controlling the same amount of earnings and other property.

(c) No unmarried person shall be denied credit if his or her earnings and other property are such that a married person managing and controlling the same amount of earnings and other property would receive credit.

(d) No unmarried person shall be offered credit on terms less favorable than those offered to a married person managing and controlling the same amount of earnings and other property.

(e) For accounts established after January 1, 1977 or for accounts in existence on January 1, 1977 where information on that account is received after January 1, 1977, a credit reporting agency which in its normal course of business receives information on joint credit accounts
identifying the persons responsible for such accounts, or receives information which reflects the participation of both spouses, shall: (1) at the time such information is received file such information separately under the names of each person or spouse, or file such information in another manner which would enable either person or spouse to automatically gain access to the credit history without having in any way to list or refer to the name of the other person, and (2) provide access to all information about the account in the name of each person or spouse.

(f) For all accounts established prior to January 1, 1977, a credit reporting agency shall at any time upon the written or personal request of a person who is or has been married, verify the contractual liability, liability by operation of law, or authorized use by such person, of joint credit accounts appearing in the file of the person’s spouse or former spouse, and, if applicable,
shall file such information separately and thereafter continue to do so under the names of each person responsible for the joint account or in another manner which would enable either person responsible for the joint account to automatically gain access to the credit history without having in any way to list or refer to the name of the other person.

(g) For the purposes of this chapter “credit” means obtainment of money, property, labor, or services on a deferred-payment basis.

(h) For the purposes of this chapter, earnings shall include, but not be limited to, spousal, family, and child support payments, pensions, social security, disability or survivorship benefits. Spousal, family, and child support payments shall be considered in the same manner as earnings from salary, wages, or other sources where the payments are received pursuant to a written agreement or court decree to
the extent that the reliability of such payments is established. The factors which a creditor may consider in evaluating the reliability of such payments are the length of time payments have been received; the regularity of receipt; and whether full or partial payments have been made.

(i) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a person from: (1) utilizing an evaluation of the reliability of earnings provided that such an evaluation is applied to persons without regard to their sex or marital status; or (2) inquiring into and utilizing an evaluation of the obligations for which community property is liable pursuant to the Family Code for the sole purpose of determining the creditor’s rights and remedies with respect to the particular extension of credit, provided that such is done with respect to all applicants without regard to their sex; or (3) utilizing any other relevant factors or methods in determining
whether to extend credit to an applicant provided that such factors or methods are applicable to all applicants without regard to their sex or marital status. For the purpose of this subdivision, the fact that an applicant is of childbearing age is not a relevant factor.

(j) Credit applications for the obtainment of money, goods, labor, or services shall clearly specify that the applicant, if married, may apply for a separate account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.31.

(a) Whoever violates Section 1812.30 shall be liable to the aggrieved person in an amount equal to the sum of any actual damages sustained by such person acting either in an individual capacity or as a representative of a class. 

(b) Whoever violates Section 1812.30 shall be liable to the aggrieved person for punitive damages in an amount not greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as determined by the court, in addition to any actual damages provided in subdivision (a); provided, however, that in pursuing the recovery allowed under this subdivision, the aggrieved person may
proceed only in an individual capacity and not as a representative of a class.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), whoever violates Section 1812.30 may be liable for punitive damages in the case of a class action in such amount as the court may allow, except that as to each member of the class no minimum recovery shall be applicable, and the total recovery in such action shall not exceed the lesser of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or one percent (1%) of the net worth of the creditor. In determining the amount of the award in any class action, the court shall consider, among other relevant factors, the amount of any actual damages awarded, the frequency and persistence of violations, the resources of the creditor, the number of persons adversely affected, and the extent to which the creditor’s violation was intentional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.32.

Any person, corporation, firm, partnership, joint stock company, or any other association or organization which violates or proposes to violate this chapter may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state in the name of the people of the State of California or by any person denied credit or offered credit in violation of Section 1812.30.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.33.

(a) Any person who intentionally violates any injunction issued pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day that such person violates the injunction.

(b) The civil penalty prescribed by this section shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction. An action brought pursuant to this section to recover such civil
penalties shall take special precedence over all civil matters on the calendar of the court except those matters to which equal precedence on the calendar is granted by law.

(c) If such an action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.34.

Any person denied credit or offered credit in violation of Section 1812.30 who brings an action pursuant to Section 1812.31 or 1812.32 of this code may petition the court for award of costs and reasonable attorney’s fees which the court shall award if the action is successful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.35.

Any action commenced pursuant to Section 1812.31 shall be commenced within two years from the date on which the person is denied credit or is offered credit in violation of Section 1812.30.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.4. CONTRACTS FOR DANCE STUDIO LESSONS AND OTHER SERVICES [1812.50. - 1812.69.]

1812.50.

(a) The Legislature finds that there exists in connection with a substantial number of contracts for dance studio lessons and other services, sales practices, and business and financing methods which have worked a fraud, deceit, imposition, and financial hardship upon the people of this state; that existing legal remedies are inadequate to correct these abuses; that the dance studio industry has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities; and that the provisions of this title relating to these contracts are necessary for the public welfare.

(b) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this title is to safeguard the public against fraud, deceit, imposition, and financial hardship, and to foster and encourage competition, fair dealing, and prosperity in the field of dance studio lessons and other services by prohibiting or restricting false or misleading advertising, onerous contract terms, harmful financial practices, and other unfair, dishonest, deceptive, destructive, unscrupulous, fraudulent, and discriminatory practices by which the public has been injured in connection with contracts for dance studio lessons and other services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.51.

As used in this title, “contract for dance studio lessons and other services” means a contract for instruction in ballroom or other types of dancing, and includes lessons and other services, whether given to students individually or in groups. This title does not include contracts for professional services rendered or furnished by a person licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or contracts for instruction at schools operating pursuant to the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.52.

Every contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall be in writing and shall be subject to this title. A copy of the written contract shall be given to the customer at the time he or she signs the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.53.

(a) No contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall require payments or financing by the buyer over a period in excess of one year from the date the contract is entered into, nor shall the term of any contract be measured by the life of the buyer. However, the lessons and other services to be rendered to the buyer under the contract may extend over a period not to exceed seven years from the date the contract is entered into.

(b) All contracts for dance studio
 lessons and other services that may be in effect between the same seller and the same buyer, the terms of which overlap for any period, shall be considered as one contract for the purposes of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1024, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.54.

(a) Every contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall provide that performance of the agreed-upon lessons will begin within six months from the date the contract is entered into.

(b) A contract for dance studio lessons and other services may be canceled by the student at any time provided he or she gives written notice to the dance studio at the address specified in the contract. When a contract for dance studio lessons and other services is canceled the
 dance studio shall calculate the refund on the contract, if any, on a pro rata basis. The dance studio shall refund any moneys owed to the student within 10 days of receiving the cancellation notice, unless the student owes the dance studio money for studio lessons or other services received prior to the cancellation, in which case any moneys owed the dance studio shall be deducted by the dance studio from the refund owed to the student and the balance, if any, shall be refunded as specified above. A dance studio shall not charge a cancellation fee, or other fee, for cancellation of the contract by the student.

(c) Every contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall contain a written statement of the hourly rate charged for each type of lesson for which the student has contracted. If the contract includes dance studio lessons that are sold at different per-hour rates, the contract shall contain separate hourly rates for each
 different type of lesson sold. All other services for which the student has contracted that are not capable of a per-hour charge shall be set forth in writing in specific terms. The statement shall be contained in the dance studio contract before the contract is signed by the buyer.

(d) Every dance studio subject to Sections 1812.64 and 1812.65 shall include in every contract for dance studio lessons or other services a statement that the studio is bonded and that information concerning the bond may be obtained by writing to the office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.55.

No contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall require or entail the execution of any note or series of notes by the buyer which, when separately negotiated, will cut off as to third parties any right of action or defense which the buyer may have against the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.56.

No right of action or defense arising out of a contract for dance studio lessons and other services which the buyer has against the seller, and which would be cut off by assignment, shall be cut off by assignment of the contract to any third party whether or not he or she acquires the contract in good faith and for value unless the assignee gives notice of the assignment to the buyer as provided in this section and, within 30 days of the mailing of notice, receives no written notice of the facts giving rise to the claim or defense of the buyer. A notice of assignment shall be in writing addressed to the buyer at the address shown on the contract and
 shall identify the contract and inform the buyer that he or she shall, within 30 days of the date of mailing of the notice, notify the assignee in writing of any facts giving rise to a claim or defense which he or she may have. The notice of assignment shall state the name of the seller and buyer, a description of the lessons and other services, the contract balance, and the number and amount of the installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.57.

(a) Every contract for dance studio lessons and other services shall contain a clause providing that if, by reason of death or disability, the person agreeing to receive lessons and other services is unable to receive all lessons and other services for which he or she has contracted, the person and his or her estate shall be relieved from the obligation of making payment for lessons and other services other than those received prior to death or the onset of disability, and that if the buyer has prepaid any sum for lessons and other services so much of that sum as is allocable to lessons and other services he or she has not taken
 shall be promptly refunded to the buyer or his or her representative.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, whenever the contract price is payable in installments and the buyer is relieved from making further payments or entitled to a refund under this section, the buyer shall be entitled to receive a refund or refund credit of so much of the cash price as is allocable to the lessons or other services not actually received by the buyer. The refund of the finance charge shall be computed according to the “sum of the balances method,” also known as the “Rule of 78”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.58.

The provisions of this title are not exclusive and do not relieve the parties or the contracts subject thereto from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.59.

Any contract for dance studio lessons and other services which does not comply with the applicable provisions of this title shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.60.

Any contract for dance studio lessons and other services entered into in reliance upon any willful and false, fraudulent, or misleading information, representation, notice, or advertisement of the seller shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.61.

Any waiver of the buyer of the provisions of this title shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.62.

(a) Any buyer injured by a violation of this title may bring an action for the recovery of damages. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed plus reasonable attorney fees.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this title, any failure to comply with any provision of this title may be corrected within 30 days after the execution of the contract by the buyer, and, if so corrected, neither the seller nor the holder shall be subject to any penalty under this title, provided that any correction which increases any monthly payment, the number
 of payments, or the total amount due, must be concurred in, in writing, by the buyer. “Holder” includes the seller who acquires the contract, or, if the contract is purchased by a financing agency or other assignee, the financing agency or other assignee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.63.

Any person who violates any provision of this title relating to dance studio contracts is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any superior court of this state has jurisdiction in equity to restrain and enjoin the violation of any of the provisions of this title relating to dance studio contracts.

The duty to institute actions for violation of those provisions of this title, including equity proceedings to restrain and enjoin violations, is hereby vested in the Attorney General, district attorneys, and city attorneys. The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney may prosecute misdemeanor actions or
 institute equity proceedings, or both.

This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the enforcement by any person of any right provided by this or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.64.

Every dance studio shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond shall be 25 percent of the dance studio’s gross income from the studio business in this state during the studio’s last fiscal year, except that the principal sum of the bond shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the first or any subsequent year of operation.

A copy of the bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State, together with a declaration under
 penalty of perjury signed by the owner of the studio stating the dance studio’s gross income from the dance studio business in this state during the last fiscal year. The information contained in the declaration shall not be subject to public inspection. If the person in whose name the bond is issued severs his or her relationship with the bonded dance studio, the new owner shall, as a condition of doing business, notify the Secretary of State of the change of ownership and of proof of compliance with Sections 1812.64 and 1812.65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1024, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.65.

The bond required by Section 1812.64 shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who, after entering into a contract for dance studio lessons and other services with the dance studio, is damaged by fraud or dishonesty or failure to provide the services of the studio in performance of the contract.
